Hawaii statutes.
§428-1006 Revocation of certificate of
authority. (a) A certificate of authority of a foreign limited liability
company to transact business in this State may be revoked by the director in
the manner provided in subsection (b) if:

(1) The company fails to:

(A) Pay any fees prescribed by law;

(B) File its annual report for a period of two
years pursuant to section 428-210;

(C) Appoint and maintain an agent for service
of process as required by this part; or

(D) File a statement of a change in the name
or business address of the agent as required by this part; or

(2) A misrepresentation has been made of any material
matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record or document
submitted by the company pursuant to this part.

(b) The director may not revoke a certificate
of authority of a foreign limited liability company unless the director sends
the company notice of the revocation, at least sixty days before its effective
date, by mailing the notice to the foreign limited liability company at its
last known address appearing in the director's records. The notice shall
identify the cause for the revocation of the certificate of authority. If the
foreign limited liability company does not cure its failure by the date
specified in the notice of revocation, the director may issue a certificate of
revocation that shall be filed in the office of the director. The authority of
the company to transact business in this State shall cease upon the issuance of
the certificate of revocation. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §101;
am L 2002, c 130, §109; am L 2003, c 124, §79]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next